Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3414
Engineer-intern, defined.

Engineer-intern means a person who has been duly enrolled as an engineer-intern by the board.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 14;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 12.